Illinois, session 104th, SB2828.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1193 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1193)7    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 8delayed effective date)9    Sec. 5-1193 5-1192. Building inspector requirements.10    (a) In this Section, "building inspector" means (i) a 11State or county employee whose duties include the inspection 12or examination of structures or property in a county to 13determine if zoning or other code violations exist or (ii) a 14third party contracting with the county whose duties include 15the inspection or examination of structures or property in a 16county to determine if zoning or other code violations exist. 17"Building inspector" includes a code enforcement officer, as 18defined in Section 5-41005.19    (b) A building inspector who performs inspections or 20examinations under this Code must:21        (1) hold the following certifications certification 22    from the International Code Council: in the area in which 23    the inspector is inspecting or examining.   SB2828- 2 -LRB104 18028 RTM 31467 b1            (A) a residential building inspector 2        certification, if inspecting or examining residential 3        buildings;4            (B) a commercial building inspector certification, 5        if inspecting or examining commercial buildings;6            (C) a property maintenance and housing inspector 7        certification, if inspecting or examining property 8        maintenance; or 9            (D) a certified building official certification, 10        if inspecting or examining in multiple disciplines;11        (2) be credentialed through an equivalent nationally 12    or state-recognized building certification or 13    apprenticeship program approved by the United States 14    Department of Labor in the area the building inspector is 15    inspecting or examining; or16        (3) be licensed under the Illinois Architecture 17    Practice Act of 1989, the Professional Engineering 18    Practice Act of 1989, or the Structural Engineering 19    Practice Act of 1989. 20    The county must keep on file a copy of the certifications 21of the persons doing inspections or examinations on its 22behalf. A building inspector under this Section may have a 23grace period of 18 months one year from the date of hire or the 24effective date of this Section, whichever is later, to acquire 25the certification or credentials required under this Section. 26    An individual performing plumbing inspections shall be   SB2828- 3 -LRB104 18028 RTM 31467 b1licensed under the Illinois Plumbing Licensing Law and shall 2be exempt from this Section. 3(Source: P.A. 104-262, eff. 1-1-27; revised 10-2-25.) 4    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-31.1-1.5 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.1-1.5)7    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 8delayed effective date)9    Sec. 11-31.1-1.5. Building inspector requirements. A 10building inspector who performs inspections or examinations 11under this Division must:12        (1) hold the following certifications certification 13    from the International Code Council: in the area in which 14    the inspector is inspecting or examining.15            (A) a residential building inspector 16        certification, if inspecting or examining residential 17        buildings;18            (B) a commercial building inspector certification, 19        if inspecting or examining commercial buildings;20            (C) a property maintenance and housing inspector 21        certification, if inspecting or examining property 22        maintenance; or 23            (D) a certified building official certification, 24        if inspecting or examining in multiple disciplines;  SB2828- 4 -LRB104 18028 RTM 31467 b1        (2) be credentialed through an equivalent nationally 2    or state-recognized building certification or 3    apprenticeship program approved by the United States 4    Department of Labor in the area the building inspector is 5    inspecting or examining; or6        (3) be licensed under the Illinois Architecture 7    Practice Act of 1989, the Professional Engineering 8    Practice Act of 1989, or the Structural Engineering 9    Practice Act of 1989. 10    The municipality must keep on file a copy of the 11certifications of the persons doing inspections or 12examinations on its behalf. A building inspector under this 13Section may have a grace period of 18 months one year from the 14date of hire or the effective date of this Section, whichever 15is later, to acquire the certification or credentials required 16under this Section. 17    An individual performing plumbing inspections shall be 18licensed under the Illinois Plumbing Licensing Law and shall 19be exempt from this Section. 20(Source: P.A. 104-262, eff. 1-1-27.)